Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.aff
FLAG num
SFX 755	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 755	eure	eya	.		#imperfecte
SFX 755	eure	eyes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 755	eure	éyem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 755	eure	éyeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 755	eure	eyen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 756	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 756	eure	ea	.		#imperfecte
SFX 756	eure	ees	.		#imperfecte
SFX 756	eure	éem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 756	eure	éeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 756	eure	een	.		#imperfecte

SFX 757	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 757	ir	c/453	.		#present
SFX 757	ir	ir/453	.		#present

SFX 758	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 758	ir	ir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 758	ir	a/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 758	ir	am/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 758	ir	au/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 758	ir	en/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 759	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 759	iure	eïa	.		#imperfecte
SFX 759	iure	eïes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 759	iure	eíem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 759	iure	eíeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 759	iure	eïen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 760	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 760	iure	ia	.		#imperfecte
SFX 760	iure	ies	.		#imperfecte
SFX 760	iure	íem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 760	iure	íeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 760	iure	ien	.		#imperfecte

SFX 761	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 761	iure	eya	.		#imperfecte
SFX 761	iure	eyes	.		#imperfecte
SFX 761	iure	éyem	.		#imperfecte
SFX 761	iure	éyeu	.		#imperfecte
SFX 761	iure	eyen	.		#imperfecte

SFX 762	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 762	lluir	lluc/453	.		#present
SFX 762	lluir	llus/453	.		#present
SFX 762	lluir	llu/453	.		#present
SFX 762	lluir	0/453	.		#present
SFX 762	lluir	lluen/453	.		#present

SFX 763	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 763	mir	guera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 763	mir	gueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 763	mir	guérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 763	mir	guéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 763	mir	gueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 764	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 764	mir	c/453	.		#present
SFX 764	mir	ms/453	.		#present
SFX 764	mir	m/453	.		#present
SFX 764	mir	mim/453	.		#present
SFX 764	mir	miu/453	.		#present
SFX 764	mir	men/453	.		#present

SFX 765	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 765	mir	mir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 765	mir	m/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 765	mir	ga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 765	mir	gam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 765	mir	gau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 765	mir	guen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 766	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 766	mir	ga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 766	mir	gues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 766	mir	gam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 766	mir	gau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 766	mir	guen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 767	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 767	mir	guí	.		#perfecte
SFX 767	mir	gueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 767	mir	gué	.		#perfecte
SFX 767	mir	guérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 767	mir	guéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 767	mir	gueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 768	Y	3	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 768	mir	mir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 768	mir	guem/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 768	mir	gueu/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 769	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 769	oldre	ull/453	.		#present
SFX 769	oldre	oldre/453	.		#present

SFX 770	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 770	oldre	ullga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 770	oldre	ullgues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 770	oldre	ullgam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 770	oldre	ullgau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 770	oldre	ullguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 771	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 771	oldre	oldre/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 771	oldre	ol/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 771	oldre	ullga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 771	oldre	ullgam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 771	oldre	ullgau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 771	oldre	ullguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 772	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 772	oldre	ullc/453	.		#present
SFX 772	oldre	ols/453	.		#present
SFX 772	oldre	ol/453	.		#present
SFX 772	oldre	olem/453	.		#present
SFX 772	oldre	oleu/453	.		#present
SFX 772	oldre	olen/453	.		#present

SFX 773	Y	2	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 773	oldre	oldre/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 773	oldre	ullgues/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 774	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 774	oldre	ullguera	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 774	oldre	ullgueres	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 774	oldre	ullguérem	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 774	oldre	ullguéreu	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte
SFX 774	oldre	ullgueren	.		#subjuntiuImperfecte

SFX 775	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 775	oldre	ullguí	.		#perfecte
SFX 775	oldre	ullgueres	.		#perfecte
SFX 775	oldre	ullgué	.		#perfecte
SFX 775	oldre	ullguérem	.		#perfecte
SFX 775	oldre	ullguéreu	.		#perfecte
SFX 775	oldre	ullgueren	.		#perfecte

SFX 776	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 776	omplir	òmpliga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 776	omplir	òmpligues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 776	omplir	ompligam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 776	omplir	ompligau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 776	omplir	òmpliguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 777	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 777	omplir	omplir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 777	omplir	ompli/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 777	omplir	òmpliga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 777	omplir	ompligam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 777	omplir	ompligau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 777	omplir	òmpliguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 778	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 778	omplir	òmplic/453	.		#present
SFX 778	omplir	omplis/453	.		#present
SFX 778	omplir	ompli/453	.		#present
SFX 778	omplir	omplim/453	.		#present
SFX 778	omplir	ompliu/453	.		#present
SFX 778	omplir	òmplin/453	.		#present

SFX 779	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 779	onyir	unyga/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 779	onyir	unygues/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 779	onyir	unygam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 779	onyir	unygau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 779	onyir	unyguen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 780	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 780	onyir	unyc/453	.		#present
SFX 780	onyir	unys/453	.		#present
SFX 780	onyir	uny/453	.		#present
SFX 780	onyir	onyim/453	.		#present
SFX 780	onyir	onyiu/453	.		#present
SFX 780	onyir	unyen/453	.		#present

SFX 781	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 781	onyir	onyir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 781	onyir	uny/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 781	onyir	unyga/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 781	onyir	unygam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 781	onyir	unygau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 781	onyir	unguen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 782	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 782	onyir	unya/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 782	onyir	unyes/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 782	onyir	unyam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 782	onyir	unyau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 782	onyir	unyen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 783	Y	6	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 783	opir	opir/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 783	opir	up/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 783	opir	upa/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 783	opir	upam/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 783	opir	upau/453	.		#imperatiu
SFX 783	opir	upen/453	.		#imperatiu

SFX 784	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 784	opir	upa/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 784	opir	upes/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 784	opir	upam/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 784	opir	upau/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent
SFX 784	opir	upen/453	.		#subjuntiuPresent

SFX 785	Y	5	#Generada automaticament per a les derivacions verbals
SFX 785	opir	up/453	.		#present
SFX 785	opir	ups/453	.		#present
SFX 785	opir	opim/453	.		#present
SFX 785	opir	opiu/453	.		#present
SFX 785	opir	upen/453	.		#present
