Materials for lyx workshop/LyX.app/Contents/Resources/dicts/ca_XV.dic
adormir/451,455,456,467,468,469,763,764,765,766,767,768,828,1054,1057
ajopir/451,455,456,467,468,469,783,784,785,828,1054
creure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,755,756,1043,1057,1061
descreure/481,482,499,500,501,502,509,514,755,756,1061
dormir/455,456,467,468,469,763,764,765,766,767,768,828,1054,1057
escopir/451,455,456,467,468,469,783,784,785,828,1054
esmonyir/451,455,456,467,468,469,779,780,781,782,828,976,1054
monyir/455,456,467,468,469,779,780,781,782,828,977,1054
morir/455,456,467,468,469,516,757,758,786,787,788,789,790,828,1057,1084
premorir/451,455,456,467,468,469,574,757,786,787,788,789,790,828,946,1057,1084
relluir/455,456,491,493,494,495,496,497,516,521,762,828,955,956,957,958,959,1055
reomplir/455,456,467,468,469,776,777,778,828,1054
riure/481,482,499,500,501,502,514,759,760,761,1057,1095
somriure/481,482,499,500,501,502,514,759,760,761,796,797,798,799,800,801,802,1094,1095
voldre/481,482,483,484,490,769,770,771,772,773,774,775,1056
